District of Columbia statutes.
44-1502

Society to have certain officers.

The officers of said corporation shall consist of a president, 5 vice-presidents, 1 secretary, 1 treasurer, an executive committee of 11 members, and such other officers as shall from time to time seem necessary to this Society.

June 21, 1870, 16 Stat. 158, ch. 135, § 2
1981 Ed., § 32-902.
1973 Ed., § 32-202.